Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,108
Tax-exempt trailers; distinctive plates.

The department may provide distinctive license plates issued for use on trailers exempt pursuant to subdivision (6) of section 60-3,185. License plates on such trailers shall display, in addition to the license number, the word exempt which shall appear at the bottom of the license plates.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 108.